Utah statutes.
58-60-207.   Scope of practice -- Limitations.

(1)  A clinical social worker may engage in all acts and practices defined as the practice of clinical social work without supervision, in private and independent practice, or as an employee of another person, limited only by the licensee's education, training, and competence.

(2)  To the extent an individual is professionally prepared by the education and training track completed while earning a master's or doctor of social work degree, a licensed certified social worker may engage in all acts and practices defined as the practice of certified social work consistent with the licensee's education, clinical training, experience, and competence:

(a)  under supervision of a clinical social worker and as an employee of another person when engaged in the practice of mental health therapy;

(b)  without supervision and in private and independent practice or as an employee of another person, if not engaged in the practice of mental health therapy;

(c)  including engaging in the private, independent, unsupervised practice of social work as a self-employed individual, in partnership with other licensed clinical or certified social workers, as a professional corporation, or in any other capacity or business entity, so long as he does not practice unsupervised psychotherapy; and

(d)  supervising social service workers as provided by division rule.



Enacted by Chapter 32, 1994 General Session

